Hawaii statutes.
§76-29 Person ineligible for appointment.
A person shall be ineligible for any appointment in the civil service for a
specified period of time as determined appropriate by the director for reasons
including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Deception, fraud, or providing false or
misleading statements of material facts in the application or examination
process;

(2) Unauthorized or improper assistance in an
examination; or

(3) A determination of unsuitability for employment.
[L 1955, c 274, pt of §1; RL 1955, §3-21(j); am L 1963, c 16, §1; HRS §76-29;
am L 2000, c 253, §21]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next